Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3A-403]
Other exceptions to notice and opt out requirements for disclosure of nonpublic
personal financial information. (a) The requirements for initial notice
in section 431:3A-201, the opt out in sections 431:3A-204, and 431:3A-301, and
service providers and joint marketing in section 431:3A-401 shall not apply if
a licensee discloses nonpublic personal financial information:

(1) With the consent or at the direction of the
consumer, who has not revoked the consent or direction;

(2) To protect the confidentiality or security of a
licensee’s records pertaining to the consumer, service, product, or
transaction;

(3) To protect against or prevent actual or potential
fraud or unauthorized transactions;

(4) For required institutional risk control;

(5) For resolving consumer disputes or inquiries;

(6) To persons holding a legal or beneficial interest
relating to the consumer or to persons acting in a fiduciary or representative
capacity on behalf of the consumer;

(7) To provide information to insurance rate advisory
organizations, guaranty funds or agencies, agencies that are rating a licensee,
persons that are assessing the licensee’s compliance with industry standards,
or the licensee’s attorneys, accountants, and auditors;

(8) To the extent specifically permitted or required
under other provisions of law and in accordance with the Right to Financial
Privacy Act of 1978, Title 12 United States Code section 3401 et seq., as
amended, to law enforcement agencies including the Federal Reserve Board, Office
of the Comptroller of the Currency, Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation,
Office of Thrift Supervision, National Credit Union Administration, the
Securities and Exchange Commission, and the Secretary of the Treasury, with
respect to Title 31 United States Code chapter 53, subchapter II (Records and
Reports on Monetary Instruments and Transactions), as amended, and Title 12
United States Code chapter 21 (Financial Recordkeeping), as amended, a state
insurance authority, and the Federal Trade Commission, self‑regulatory
organizations, or for an investigation on a matter related to public safety;

(9) To a consumer reporting agency in accordance with
the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, Title 15 United States Code section
1681, et seq., as amended, or from a consumer report reported by a consumer
reporting agency;

(10) In connection with a proposed or actual sale,
merger, transfer, or exchange of all or a portion of a business or operating
unit if the disclosure of nonpublic personal financial information concerns
solely consumers of the business or unit;

(11) To comply with federal, state, or local laws,
rules, and other applicable legal requirements;

(12) To comply with a properly authorized civil,
criminal, or regulatory investigation, or subpoena or summons by federal,
state, or local authorities;

(13) To respond to judicial process or government
regulatory authorities having jurisdiction over a licensee for examination,
compliance, or other purposes as authorized by law; or

(14) For purposes related to the replacement of a
group benefit plan, a group health plan, a group welfare plan, or a workers’
compensation plan.

(b) A
consumer may revoke a consent by subsequently exercising the right to opt out
of future disclosures of nonpublic personal information as permitted under
section 431:3A-204. [L 2001, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next